HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
акредитувати/AB
американізувати/AB
апроксимувати/ABGH
афішувати/AB
балувати/AB
бинтувати/AB
божитися/BH
броїтися/BH
бухнути/ABEF
варіювати/AB
ввімкнути/ABEF
вглиблювати/AB
вдивитися/BF
вергнути/AB
взаємозамінювати/AB
вибруковувати/ABGH
вивідувати/AB
вигаптувати/AB
вигодовувати/AB
вигравати/ABGH
видобутися/B
вижолоблювати/AB
виказувати/AB
виклювати/AB
викорчовувати/ABGH
викроїти/AB
вилежатися/B
вилуплювати/AB
вимірювати/ABGH
вимуштрувати/AB
випарювати/AB
виплоджувати/ABGHOP
виправити/ABCD
випрямити/AB
вирішити/ABEF
висварити/AB
вискоблюватися/B
висмоктувати/ABGH
вистоювати/AB
висходитися/B
витолочувати/AB
витрусити/ABEF
вихитритися/B
вихрити/AB
вичленувати/AB
виявити/ABEF
відваджуватися/B
відвоювати/AB
відгородити/ABEF
від'єднувати/AB
відімкнути/ABEF
відколупнути/ABEF
відкупити/ABEF
відлущитися/B
відмолювати/AB
відпилювати/AB
відправити/ABCD
відредагувати/AB
відсахнутися/BF
відсмоктуватися/B
відсуджуватися/B
відучити/ABEF
відчахувати/AB
відшліфовувати/ABGH
вклеювати/AB
вкотитися/B
вмазати/AB
вносити/ABCDGH
ворюватися/B
вплавити/AB
вразитися/B
всилитися/B
втішити/ABCD
вчинювати/AB
генералізуватися/B
голосити/ABEF
гримувати/AB
дезавуювати/AB
деполітизувати/ABGH
дислокувати/ABGH
довередуватися/B
додовбуватися/B
документувати/AB
домощуватися/B
доплигуватися/B
доскакати/AB
дотинятися/B
дошукуватися/B
ексгумувати/AB
жестикулювати/AB
забарикадовувати/AB
забруднювати/ABGH
завішувати/AB
загартувати/AB
загодувати/AB
задекларувати/AB
заземлити/ABEF
заквапити/AB
законспіровувати/AB
закропити/AB
заліковувати/AB
замарширувати/AB
замордувати/AB
занотовуватися/B
запатентувати/AB
заплющувати/AB
заприязнюватися/B
зароджувати/AB
засипати/ABIJGH
засновувати/ABGH
застрілитися/B
затискувати/AB
затулювати/AB
захлопнутися/B
зачистити/ABEF
заявитися/B
збунтувати/AB
зволожити/AB
згрупувати/AB
здобути/AB
зіходити/AB
змальовувати/AB
зморити/AB
знекровлювати/AB
зноровитися/B
зрівнювати/AB
зцілювати/AB
інжектувати/ABGH
казати/ABGH
кинути/ABCD
колоситися/B
конфіскувати/AB
кресати/AB
лагодити/AB
лініювати/AB
маневрувати/AB
механізувати/AB
молотитися/B
набрати/AB
навчити/ABEF
надзвонювати/AB
наелектризовувати/AB
накопичувати/ABGHOP
налучити/AB
нанизати/AB
напсувати/AB
насилувати/AB
настроїти/ABCD
натужувати/AB
нашептати/AB
недосолювати/AB
нуртувати/AB
обгородити/ABEF
обкопувати/AB
обмалювати/AB
обнюхувати/AB
обрубувати/AB
обтісуватися/B
огорнутися/B
оздоровити/ABCD
окупувати/AB
ополоснути/AB
освинцюватися/B
оснаститися/B
офірувати/AB
пакетувати/ABGH
перебазувати/AB
перевірити/ABCD
перегруповувати/AB
перезбуджуватися/B
перекочувати/AB
перемастити/AB
перенизувати/AB
переперізувати/AB
перепрягти/AB
пересіювати/AB
перетерпіти/AB
перехоплювати/ABGH
підбурювати/AB
підійняти/AB
підлаштовувати/ABOP
підмуровувати/AB
підрум'янити/ABCD
підсумовувати/AB
пінити/AB
побоюватися/BH
повкочувати/AB
погоїти/AB
поетизувати/ABGH
позасмальцьовувати/AB
поінформувати/AB
покрутнути/AB
помадити/AB
понавозити/AB
понудити/AB
попереплутувати/AB
поприщулюватися/B
порозтріскуватися/B
поскручувати/AB
постулювати/AB
потребувати/ABGH
поцікавитися/BD
працевлаштовувати/AB
приволочитися/B
придобритися/B
прикручувати/AB
примружити/ABCD
приплатитися/B
прислуховуватися/B
притишувати/AB
причепити/ABEF
проварити/AB
продивитися/B
прокип'ятити/ABEF
промахнутися/B
проплачувати/AB
прослідити/ABEF
простягнути/ABEF
прохолоджувати/AB
пустошитися/B
редагувати/AB
реформувати/ABGHOP
розбризкувати/AB
розгадувати/AB
роздерти/AB
роззирнутися/B
розкошувати/AB
розлютити/AB
розмочити/ABEF
розписати/AB
розпорядитися/B
розсаджувати/AB
розташовувати/ABGH
розхвалювати/AB
розшаркуватися/B
рунитися/B
самостверджуватися/B
силосувати/AB
скинути/ABCD
скопіювати/AB
скубти/AB
сорбувати/AB
списувати/ABGH
споганити/AB
спрацювати/AB
ставити/ABCDGH
стоплювати/AB
стукнути/ABEF
сформувати/AB
тарувати/AB
тлумачити/ABCDGH
трансформувати/ABGHOP
тушувати/AB
увічнювати/AB
удостоювати/AB
укотити/ABEF
умовчувати/AB
уписатися/B
урвати/AB
услухуватися/B
утиснути/ABEF
ухитритися/BF
фасувати/AB
хизуватися/BHP
цідити/ABEF
шарахнути/ABEF
штампувати/ABGH
